DIAGNOSTICS -

AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for2UZ

—FE)

DI-67

DIAUV-01

DTC P0973/62 | Shift Solenoid ”A” Control Circuit Low
(Shift Solenoid ValveS 1)
DTC P0974/62 | Shift Solenoid ”A” Control Circuit High
(Shift Solenoid ValveS 1)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

See page DI-49.

tion logic)

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

Engineand ECT ECU detects shortin solenoid valve S1 circuit ¢ Shortin shift solenoid valve S1 circuit
P0973/62 4times when solenoid valve S1 is operated (1 ~trip detection « Shiftsolenoid valve S1

logic) *EngineandECTECU

Engineand ECT ECU detects openin solenoid valve S1 circuit ¢ Openinshiftsolenoid valve S1 circuit
P0974/62 4times when solenoid valve S1is not operated (1 -tripdetect e« Shiftsolenoid valve S1

*EngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDU
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between S1 of transmission wire connec-
tor and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)

NG> Go to step 3.

tor.

2 [ Measure resistance between terminal S1 and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU connec-
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PREPARATION:
(@ Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals S1 and E1 of Engine
and ECT ECU connector.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN-38).

(See page IN-38).

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
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3 Check shift solenoid valve S1.

@

PREPARATION:
(@) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(¢) Remove the shift solenoid valve S1.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
minal and the battery negative lead to the solenoid body
ground.
OK:
Solenoid sounds operation noise.

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve S1
(See page AT-8).

Repair or replace the transmission wire

(See page AT-6).
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